Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2027.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1712-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1712-E. Executive Offices.* * *(g) Public Sector Workplace Safety Equipment Account.- - (1) The Public Sector Workplace Safety Equipment Account is established as a restricted account in the General Fund.(2) No later than October 1, 2025, the Secretary of the Budget shall transfer to the account under paragraph (1) amounts unexpended from appropriations from the General Fund to agencies under the Governor's jurisdiction for general government operations for fiscal years beginning prior to July 1, 2024, in amounts not to exceed $3,800,000. Before making a transfer under this paragraph, the Secretary of the Budget shall:(i) transmit notice of the proposed transfer amount to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin ; a nd (ii) provide a notice of the proposed transfer to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) Money in the account under paragraph (1) is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Office of 20250HB2027PN2585 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Administration for the purchase and distribution of safety equipment for Commonwealth agencies determined by the Secretary of Administration to employ significant numbers of employees at risk for workplace musculoskeletal disorders. The following shall apply:(i) The safety equipment for Commonwealth agency employees shall include lift kits or assistive devices for patient handling in health care occupations and postural support devices for construction-related occupations.(ii) A Commonwealth agency eligible for safety equipment under this paragraph shall include a Commonwealth agency engaged in any of the following activities:(A) The operation of nursing care and other residential care facilities.(B) The operation of residential facilities for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.(C) Highway, street and bridge construction.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB2027PN2585 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122